California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 640.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

2118.

When the State Controller determines it to be necessary, he may require a county or city to deposit money received from the Highway Users Tax Fund in a separate bank account.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1060.)
-------------------------------------------

2118.5.

All or a portion of the cost of furnishing warranted traffic control personnel whose function is to assist students in crossing streets and highways and avoiding traffic hazards may be charged against money apportioned to cities, cities and counties, or counties from the Highway Users Tax Account in the Transportation Tax Fund. The amount charged shall not exceed the portion of money derived from the tax under the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund. The department may assist local agencies in establishing warrants for crossing guard protection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 681, Sec. 71.)
-------------------------------------------

2119.

The State Controller shall not draw his warrant upon the Highway Users Tax Fund in favor of any county or city which has failed to establish any road or street fund as required by law, which has failed to deposit money received from the Highway Users Tax Fund in a separate bank account when required under Section 2118, which has failed, neglected or refused to file any report required by law, showing the amount of money received by such county or city from the Highway Users Tax Fund and the disposition thereof, or which has failed, neglected, or refused to restore any such moneys not expended in conformance with any law or constitutional provision. On satisfactory proof by
 such county or city to the State Controller of the establishment of such road or street fund, the depositing of money in a separate bank account, the filing of such report, or the restoration of the improperly expended moneys, such warrant shall be issued.

A county or city shall have a reasonable time, after notification from the State Controller, to comply with the provisions of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1060.)
-------------------------------------------

2120.

Upon the request of the board of supervisors of any county, the Controller may deduct from the apportionment to such county any amount specified in such request and pay the amount to any state department for services to be furnished in accordance with the request.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

2121.

(a) In May of each year each county shall submit to the department any additions or exclusions from its mileage of maintained county highways, specifying the termini and mileage of each route added or excluded from its county maintained roads. The department shall either approve or disapprove each inclusion or exclusion. A county may appeal any disapproval as provided in Section 74. The department shall certify county mileage figures to the Controller, as required. No appeal shall affect any apportionment made by the Controller pending the
 determination of the appeal. If, on appeal, additional mileage is allowed the county, the department shall immediately certify the corrected figure to the Controller, and the same shall be used for subsequent apportionments.

(b) Upon relinquishing any state highway or portion thereof to a county, the department shall immediately certify to the Controller the mileage so relinquished and the same shall immediately be added to the county’s maintained mileage of county roads for purposes of subsequent apportionments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 597, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2122.

Contracts for any construction and improvement projects on county highways for which it is anticipated funds from the Highway Users Tax Fund will be available during any fiscal year may be awarded on and after the first day of March preceding the beginning of the fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 204.)
-------------------------------------------

2126.

(a) The money appropriated pursuant to Item 9675-101-890 of the Budget Act of 1985 (Chapter 111 of the Statutes of 1985) is hereby appropriated to the Controller for allocation to counties and cities for street and highway maintenance and reconstruction, 55 percent to the cities for allocation pursuant to subdivision (b) and 45 percent to the counties for allocation pursuant to subdivision (c).

(b) (1) The amount to be allocated to a city, including a city and county, equals the amount available for allocation to the cities
 pursuant to subdivision (a) times the ratio of the total allocation it received pursuant to Section 2107 over all allocations made pursuant to that section during the prior fiscal year. 

(2) In the case of a city whose incorporation was effective between July 1, 1984, and October 2, 1986, inclusive, and which did not receive the equivalent of a full year allocation of funds appropriated for allocation pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 7 of Chapter 1600 of the Statutes of 1985 or pursuant to subdivision (a) of this section, the amount calculated for allocation pursuant to subdivision (b) of that Section 7 shall be increased by an amount which will provide the city an amount equivalent to the total allocation it would have received pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of that Section 7 and subdivision (a) of this section.

(c) Fifty-five percent of the funds payable under this
 section to counties, including a city and county, shall be apportioned among the counties in the proportion that the number of fee-paid and exempt vehicles registered in each county bears to the total number of fee-paid and exempt vehicles which are registered in the state.

Forty-five percent of the funds payable under this section to counties, including a city and county, shall be apportioned among the counties in the proportion that the number of miles of maintained county roads in each county bears to the total number of miles of maintained county roads in the state.

(d) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Maintenance” means (A) patching and (B) overlay and sealing.

(2) “Reconstruction” does not include widening to increase the traffic capacity of a street or highway, but
 does include any widening of the roadway if the widening is necessary to bring the roadway width to the desirable minimum width consistent with the geometric design criteria of the department for nonfreeway 3R (reconstruction, resurfacing, and rehabilitation) projects.

(e) The Controller shall allocate the funds available for that Item 9675-101-890 within 30 days after they become available to the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 963, Sec. 1.   Effective September 22, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

2127.

(a) (1) Except in the case of a city or county which has made an election pursuant to paragraph (2) or (3) of this subdivision, in order to receive any allocation pursuant to Section 2126 or Section 7 of Chapter 1600 of the Statutes of 1985, the city or county, as the case may be, shall expend for the maintenance and reconstruction, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 2126, of its local street and highway system during the fiscal year that it receives an allocation pursuant to Section 2126 or that Section 7 not less than its base year expenditure, excluding the allocation received pursuant to Section 2126 or
 that Section 7, or both, during the fiscal year. 

(2) A city or county may elect to expend during the two fiscal years that it receives an allocation, a total amount which is not less than twice the amount of its base year expenditure. 

(3) A city may elect to expend, during the two fiscal years that it receives an allocation and the following fiscal year, a total amount which is not less than three times the amount of its base year expenditure. This paragraph applies only to the Cities of Bakersfield, El Segundo, Novato, Oceanside, San Mateo, San Rafael, Santa Maria, Seal Beach, and Westminster. For the purposes of this paragraph, either actual expenditures or funds encumbered by contractual obligations in the 1987–88 fiscal year shall qualify as expenditures in the year after allocations are received. 

(4) Any city, except the Cities of
 Bakersfield, El Segundo, Novato, San Rafael, and Santa Maria, or county making an election pursuant to paragraph (2) or (3) shall so notify the Controller by December 31, 1987, and a city or county which fails to do so shall be governed by paragraph (1). 

(5) Any city or county with a population of 40,000 or less which makes an election pursuant to paragraph (2) or (3) and which expends funds pursuant to that election by October 30, 1988, shall be deemed to have notified the Controller pursuant to paragraph (4). 

(6) This subdivision does not apply to a city or a county, including a city which filed a notice with the Controller pursuant to subdivision (g), with a population of 10,000 or less, as most recently determined by the Department of Finance. 

(b) The amount allocated to a city or a county, as the case may be,
 shall be expended by October 30, 1988.

(c) (1) For purposes of this section, “base year expenditure” means the amount that the city or county, as the case may be, expended for patching, overlay, and sealing, and reconstruction of its local street and highway system during the 1984–85 fiscal year, as reported to the Controller pursuant to Section 2151. Any city or county, with a population of 100,000 or less as of October 1, 1986, which filed a notice with the Controller pursuant to subdivision (g), may elect to have its “base year expenditure” determined on the basis of its 1983–84 fiscal year expenditures. A city or county making this election shall so notify the Controller by December 31, 1987, and the election shall not be available to a city or county which does not so notify the Controller. 

(2) If the sum of the revenue received by a city or county
 during the fiscal year pursuant to Section 500 of Title 16, Section 104(b)(2) and (6) and Sections 125 and 144 of Title 23, and Chapter 68 (commencing with Section 5121) of Title 42 of the United States Code, and from the federal Community Block Grant Program, the federal Revenue Sharing Program, and transit assistance funds from the Transportation Planning and Development Account, which was expended for the maintenance and reconstruction of its local street and highway system during the 1984–85 fiscal year, as reported to the Controller pursuant to Section 2151, is more than the sum of funds it received from those sources during any fiscal year, the base year expenditure of the city or county, as the case may be, for the fiscal year shall be reduced by the difference between the sums. For purposes of this paragraph, “revenue received” means that percentage of the project expenditures or the maximum reimbursable amount of eligible project costs as agreed upon by the federal government and the local agency
 for those projects eligible under this paragraph. 

(d) For each fiscal year during which an allocation was made pursuant to Section 2126 or Section 7 of Chapter 1600 of the Statutes of 1985, or both, the Controller shall audit the amount each county and city expended for the maintenance and reconstruction, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 2126, of its local street and highway system during the fiscal year. For amounts allocated to counties and cities for expenditure by October 30, 1988, the audit shall be completed by October 30, 1990. 

(e) (1) If the Controller determines pursuant to subdivision (d) that a county or city, for the fiscal year, expended for the maintenance and reconstruction of its local street and highway system less than the required amount determined pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), its allocation pursuant to Section 2104 or
 2107, as the case may be, shall be reduced during the next fiscal year by the amount that its expenditure is less than the required amount, but the amount of the reduction shall not exceed the amount allocated to the city or county in each fiscal year that the city or county received funds pursuant to Section 2126 or Section 7 of Chapter 1600 of the Statutes of 1985. 

(2) Paragraph (1) does not apply to a city or county during the fiscal year in which it returns to the Controller the allocation it received pursuant to Section 2126 or that Section 7, or both. The city or county shall return the allocation plus any accrued interest within 30 days after receipt of the allocation. 

(f) Any funds withheld or returned as a result of subdivision (e) shall be reallocated to the other counties and cities whose expenditure is not less than its required amount pursuant to subdivision (b) or
 (c) of Section 2126, as the case may be. 

(g) In the case of a city or county which on or before October 1, 1986, files with the Controller a written notice declaring the inability of the city or county to comply with the matching requirement of subdivision (a), the Controller shall postpone the penalty provisions of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) and shall not reallocate the funds, as provided for by subdivision (f), until September 1, 1987. The notice to the Controller shall contain all of the following: 

(1) The amount of 1984–85 base year matching requirements as determined by the Controller’s audit. 

(2) The amount the local entity will fall short of the base year matching requirement. 

(3) The reasons why the city or county is unable to meet the
 base year matching requirement. 

(4) The amounts expended by the local entity on patching, overlay, sealing, and reconstruction of its street and highway system in fiscal years 1981–82, 1982–83, and 1983–84. 

The Controller shall, by November 1, 1986, transmit to the Chairpersons of the Senate and Assembly Transportation Committees and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee the information submitted by counties and cities in the written notices provided for in this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 775, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Accounting, Reports and Audits [2150. - 2157.]

2150.

All amounts paid to each county, out of the Highway Users Tax Fund shall be deposited in its road fund. The board may deposit in said fund any other money available for roads. All money received by a county from the Highway Users Tax Fund and all money deposited by a county in its road fund shall be expended by the county exclusively for county roads for the purposes specified in Section 2101 or for other public street and highway purposes as provided by law.

The amounts paid to a county for snow removal on county roads and for heavy rainfall and storm damage on county roads, pursuant to Section 2110, shall be kept in separate accounts in its road fund and shall be used solely for the purpose for which apportioned.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 807.)
-------------------------------------------

2151.

(a) On or before the first day of December of each year, the governing body of the county
 or city shall cause to be made and filed with the Controller a complete report of the expenditures for street or road purposes during the preceding fiscal year ending on the 30th day of June. However, the City of El Segundo, the City of Huntington Beach, the City of Inglewood, the City of Long Beach, or the City of South Lake Tahoe may send, on a one-time basis, a written notice to the Controller that it has selected a fiscal year ending on a date other than June 30, and, in that case, the fiscal year selected by the city shall be its fiscal year for reports under this section.

(b) The Controller shall prescribe the form and contents of the report. The report shall show the amount expended for construction by contract, maintenance by contract, construction by day labor, and maintenance by day labor. For construction and maintenance by day labor, the amount shall include the cost of material, labor, equipment, and overhead for work performed thereunder.

(c) The
 board of supervisors of each county shall by appropriate action, at any regular or special meeting, designate either the county road commissioner or the county auditor as the person responsible for making and signing the report required by this section. When the road commissioner is designated to make and sign the report, the county auditor shall certify the report before it is filed with the Controller. When the county auditor is designated to make and sign the report, the road commissioner shall certify the report before it is filed with the Controller. Reports made by each city shall be certified by the city’s fiscal officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 159, Sec. 1.   (AB 636)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2152.

The report shall contain the following:

(a) A detailed statement of all money available from all sources during the fiscal year covered by the report, including money made available by the United States, the state, the county or city, any other governmental agency, and money available from bond issues, special assessments, or from any other source whatever for expenditure for street or road purposes.

(b) A detailed statement of all expenditures during the fiscal year covered by the report for street or road purposes, including obligations incurred but not yet paid. The statement shall be broken down into expenditure categories,, including, but not limited to, expenditures for rights-of-way or other property, new construction, reconstruction, widening, resurfacing, maintenance, repair, and acquisition and maintenance of equipment.

The State Controller, with the advice of the department, may prescribe any other expenditure categories and may require any detail that may be deemed necessary by him or her fully to disclose the nature and extent of all financial transactions by the county or city relating to streets or roads.

(c) A detailed statement of all expenditures during the fiscal year covered by the report for snow removal or snow grooming, or both, including expenditures of money apportioned pursuant to Section 2107 or 2110. The statement shall include equipment costs in connection with snow removal or snow grooming, or both, on an hourly rental basis or on any other annual basis that the State Controller may require.

(d) In addition, the county shall compute its reimbursable snow removal costs. The reimbursable snow removal or snow grooming, or both, costs shall be in an amount equal to 80 percent of the expenditures described in subdivision (c) that are in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(e) For purposes of this section, “snow grooming” is a method whereby snow is packed down into a hard surface in order to facilitate transportation by snowmobiles or other vehicles modified or accustomed to traveling on packed snow or ice, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 619, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2153.

The State Controller shall take such steps as he may deem necessary to insure that such reports are adequate and accurate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

2154.

The Controller shall annually tabulate and compile all such reports received by him or her and shall publish and make that tabulation and compilation report publicly available on its Internet Web site, in a format that may be printed and downloaded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 159, Sec. 2.   (AB 636)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2155.

No state money shall be allocated to or made available for expenditure by any county or city at any time when such county or city is delinquent in filing the report provided for in Section 2151.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1272.)
-------------------------------------------

2157.

The Departmental Transportation Advisory Committee is hereby abolished and the department shall succeed to all of its duties and responsibilities.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 77, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.6. Intercity Corridor Demonstration Program [2170. - 2182.1.]

2170.

The Legislature finds as follows:

(a) The Sacramento-Stockton-San Franciso corridor and the Los Angeles-San Diego corridor represent unique locations for multimodal transportation demonstration programs with modern low-capital intensive transportation improvement techniques to encourage greater utilization of ground public transportation facilities. 

(b) The conclusions and recommendations contained in the Sacramento-Stockton-San Francisco Bay Area Corridor Study, filed with the Legislature in February of 1975, contained a number of proposals that should be implemented on a demonstration basis.

(c) The conclusions and recommendations contained in the report relating to the Los Angeles-San Diego corridor prepared pursuant to Chapter 1427 of the Statutes of 1974 also contained a number of proposals that should be implemented on a demonstration basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1349.)
-------------------------------------------

2170.5.

It is the intent of the Legislature that any statewide passenger rail planning shall include consideration of the California Passenger Rail Corridor defined in Section 14036.9 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1310, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

2171.

The department shall undertake three-year demonstration projects to encourage improved ground public transit services along the Sacramento-Stockton -San Francisco corridor and along the Los Angeles-San Diego corridor. The projects shall consist of the following three elements—project administration and evaluation as described in Section 2172, low-capital intensive improvement programs as described in Sections 2173 and 2176.5, and operating assistance as described in Sections 2174, 2175, and 2176.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1349.)
-------------------------------------------

2172.

The department shall be responsible for the administration, implementation, marketing, and evaluation of the projects. The department shall seek the assistance of an advisory group for each corridor.

The director shall appoint the advisory groups, which shall include representatives from user groups, consumer groups, the various public and private transit operators serving the area in which the corridor is located, the transportation planning agencies having jurisdiction of the areas within the corridor, the Public Utilities Commission, and other public and private entities affected by projects in the corridor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 579, Sec. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

2173.

From funds appropriated for such purposes, the department shall enter into an agreement with the National Railroad Passenger Corporation, pursuant to Section 403(b) of the National Railroad Passenger Service Act of 1970 (45 U.S.C. Sec. 563(b)), for improvement of railroad track and passenger facilities along the Sacramento-Oakland and Los Angeles-San Diego corridors.

First priority shall be given to those improvements which the department determines make possible time savings, such as those identified in the report prepared pursuant to Chapter 1427 of the Statutes of 1974.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 579, Sec. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

2174.

From funds appropriated for such purposes, the department shall enter into an agreement with the National Railroad Passenger Corporation, pursuant to Section 403(b) of the National Railroad Passenger Service Act of 1970 (45 U.S.C. Sec. 563(b)), for additional passenger rail service along the Sacramento-San Francisco and Los Angeles-San Diego corridors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 579, Sec. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

2174.5.

No funds shall be allocated for improvements along the Los Angeles-San Diego corridor until the director determines that an average of four or more passenger trains per day are operating over the facilities to be improved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1349.)
-------------------------------------------

2175.

From funds appropriated for such purposes, the department may undertake a program to provide feeder bus service between major population or activity centers and the nearest rail terminal served under Section 2174. The service shall be provided by operators, as defined in Section 99210 of the Public Utilities Code, or by passenger stage corporations, as defined in Section 226 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 579, Sec. 39.)
-------------------------------------------

2176.

From funds appropriated for such purposes, the department may undertake a program to provide express bus service between Stockton and a station of the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District selected by the department and the district or between Stockton and Sacramento. The service shall be provided by operators, as defined in Section 99210 of the Public Utilities Code, or by passenger stage corporations, as defined in Section 226 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 579, Sec. 40.)
-------------------------------------------

2176.5.

From funds appropriated for such purposes, the department may undertake the construction of intermodal transfer facilities located in conjunction with other rail and bus facilities in communities between Stockton and communities in the San Francisco Bay area or between Stockton and Sacramento.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 579, Sec. 41.)
-------------------------------------------

2177.

From funds appropriated by Section 4 of Chapter 1130 of the Statutes of 1975, the director shall make allocations to extend corridor rail services beyond the terminals identified in Section 2171 to population and activity centers which the director determines would give the greatest increase in patronage, relative to cost.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 579, Sec. 42.)
-------------------------------------------

2178.

The department shall seek federal and local financial assistance in financing the projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1349.)
-------------------------------------------

2180.

When considering the feasibility of rail access from the San Francisco Bay area to Sacramento and Stockton, the department shall explore, for future development, the feasibility of providing such access through connection to the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District transit system in the vicinity of corridors formed by State Highway Routes 4, 24, and 680. The department, in consultation with the district, shall also explore the feasibility of limited extension of the district’s rail system to the vicinity of Concord along the Sacramento Northern rights-of-way.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1349.)
-------------------------------------------

2182.

(a) The funds appropriated from the Traffic Congestion Relief Fund pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 14556.5 of the Government Code shall be allocated by the Controller to cities and counties for street and road maintenance, rehabilitation, and reconstruction. Four hundred million dollars ($400,000,000) shall be allocated to the counties, including a city and county, and cities, including a city and county, as follows:

(1) Fifty percent to the counties, including a city and county, in accordance with the following formulas:

(A) Seventy-five percent of the funds payable under this paragraph shall be apportioned among the counties in the proportion that the number of fee-paid and exempt vehicles that are registered in the county bears to the number of fee-paid and exempt vehicles registered in the state.

(B) Twenty-five percent of the funds payable under this paragraph shall be apportioned among the counties in the proportion that the number of miles of maintained county roads in each county bears to the total number of miles of maintained county roads in the state. For the purposes of apportioning funds under this subparagraph, any roads within the boundaries of a city and county that are not state highways shall be deemed to be county roads.

(2) Fifty percent to cities, including a city and county, apportioned among the cities in the proportion that the total population of the city bears to the total population of all the cities in the state.

(b) Funds received under this section shall be deposited as follows in order to avoid the commingling of those funds with other local funds:

(1) In the case of a city, into the city account that is designated for the receipt of state funds allocated for transportation purposes.

(2) In the case of a county, into the county road fund.

(3) In the case of a city and county, into a local account that is designated for the receipt of state funds allocated for transportation purposes.

(c) Funds apportioned to a city or county under this section shall be used only for street and highway pavement maintenance, rehabilitation, and reconstruction of necessary associated facilities such as drainage and traffic control devices. Rehabilitation or reconstruction may include widening necessary to bring the roadway width to the desirable minimum pavement width consistent with accepted design standards for local streets and roads, but does not include widening or increasing the traffic capacity of a street or road.

(d) For the purpose of allocating funds under this section to cities, counties, and a city and county, the Controller shall use the most recent population estimates prepared by the Demographic Research Unit of the Department of Finance. For a city that incorporated after January 1, 1998, that does not appear on the most recent population estimates prepared by the Demographic Research Unit, the Controller shall use the population determined for that city under Section 11005.3 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 445, Sec. 10.   Effective September 9, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2182.1.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that it intends cities and counties to use the funds made available under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 14556.5 of the Government Code to supplement existing local revenues being used for maintenance and rehabilitation of local streets and roads. Cities and counties shall maintain their existing commitment of local funds for maintenance and rehabilitation of local streets and roads in order to remain eligible for allocation and expenditure of the additional four hundred million dollars ($400,000,000) made available by Section 21 of the act that added this section.

(b) In order to receive any allocation pursuant to Section 2182, the city or county shall annually expend from its general fund for street, road, and highway purposes an amount not less than the annual average of its expenditures from its general fund during the 1996–97, 1997–98, and 1998–99 fiscal years, as reported to the Controller pursuant to Section 2151. For purposes of this subdivision, in calculating a city’s or county’s annual general fund expenditures and its average general fund expenditures for the 1996–97, 1997–98, and 1998–99 fiscal years, any unrestricted funds that the city or county may expend at its discretion, including vehicle in-lieu tax revenues and revenues from fines and forfeitures, expended for street and highway purposes shall be considered expenditures from the general fund. One-time allocations that have been expended for street and highway purposes, but which may not be available on an ongoing basis, including revenue provided under the Teeter Plan Bond Law of 1994 (Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 54773) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), may not be considered when calculating a city’s or county’s annual general fund expenditures.

(c) For any city incorporated after July 1, 1996, the Controller shall calculate an annual average of expenditure for the period between July 1, 1996, and December 31, 2000, that the city was incorporated.

(d) For purposes of subdivision (b), the Controller may request fiscal data from cities and counties in addition to data provided pursuant to Section 2151, for the 1996–97, 1997–98, and 1998–99 fiscal years. Each city and county shall furnish the data to the Controller not later than 120 days after receiving the request. The Controller may withhold payment to cities and counties that do not comply with the request for information or that provide incomplete data.

(e) The Controller may perform audits to ensure compliance with subdivision (b) when deemed necessary. Any city or county that has not complied with subdivision (b) shall reimburse the state for the funds it received during that fiscal year. Any funds withheld or returned as a result of a failure to comply with subdivision (b) shall be reallocated to the other counties and cities whose expenditures are in compliance.

(f) If a city or county fails to comply with the requirements of subdivision (b) in a particular fiscal year, the city or county may expend during that fiscal year and the following fiscal year a total amount that is not less than the total amount required to be expended for those fiscal years for purposes of complying with subdivision (b).

(g) The allocation made under Section 2182 shall be expended not later than the end of the fiscal year following the fiscal year in which the allocation was made, and any funds not expended within that period shall be returned to the Controller and shall be reallocated to the other cities and counties pursuant to the allocation formulas set forth in Section 2182.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 445, Sec. 11.   Effective September 9, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.7. Intermodal Corridors of Economic Significance [2190. - 2191.]

2190.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Intermodal Corridor of Economic Significance Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2191.

The department shall, in cooperation with regional transportation planning agencies, identify the significant transportation arteries in the state that connect or provide access to major sea or waterway ports, nationwide railway systems, airports, and interstate and intrastate highway systems, thereby serving as an intermodal corridor of economic significance. The identified corridors shall include, at a minimum, at least one corridor that serves two or more major seaports.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.8. Trade Corridors Improvement Fund [2192. - 2192.4.]

2192.

(a) The following revenues shall be allocated for infrastructure projects pursuant to this section:

(1) The revenues deposited in the Trade Corridors Enhancement Account pursuant to Section 2192.4, except for those revenues in the account that were appropriated by Senate Bill 132 of the 2017–18 Regular Session (Chapter 7 of the Statutes of 2017).

(2) An amount of federal funds equal to the amount of revenue apportioned to the state under Section 167 of Title 23 of the United States Code from the national highway freight programs, pursuant to the federal Fixing America’s Surface Transportation Act (“FAST Act,” Public Law 114-94).

(b) The
 funding described in subdivision (a) shall be available upon appropriation for allocation by the California Transportation Commission for infrastructure improvements in this state on federally designated Trade Corridors of National and Regional Significance, on the Primary Freight Network, and along other corridors that have a high volume of freight movement, as determined by the commission and as identified in the state freight plan developed pursuant to Section 13978.8 of the Government Code. Projects eligible for funding shall be included in an adopted regional transportation plan. Projects within the boundaries of a metropolitan planning organization shall be included in an adopted regional transportation plan that includes a sustainable communities strategy determined by the State Air Resources Board to achieve the region’s greenhouse gas emissions reduction targets. In developing guidelines for implementing this section, the commission shall (1) apply the guiding principles, to the maximum extent
 practicable, in the California Sustainable Freight Action Plan released in July 2016 pursuant to Executive Order No. B-32-15, and (2) consult the state freight plan and the applicable port master plan.

(c) Eligible projects for these funds include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Highway improvements to more efficiently accommodate the movement of freight, particularly for ingress and egress to and from the state’s land ports of entry, rail terminals, and seaports, including navigable inland waterways used to transport freight between seaports, land ports of entry, and airports, and to relieve traffic congestion along major trade or goods movement corridors.

(2) Freight rail system improvements to enhance the ability to move goods from seaports, land ports of entry, and airports to warehousing and
 distribution centers throughout California, including projects that separate rail lines from highway or local road traffic, improve freight rail mobility, and other projects that improve the safety, efficiency, and capacity of the rail freight system.

(3) Projects to enhance the capacity and efficiency of ports, except that funds available under this section shall not be allocated to a project that includes the purchase of fully automated cargo handling equipment. For the purposes of this paragraph, “fully automated” means equipment that is remotely operated or remotely monitored, with or without the exercise of human intervention or control. Nothing in this paragraph shall prohibit the use of funds available pursuant to this section for a project that includes the purchase of human-operated zero-emission equipment, human-operated near-zero-emission equipment, and infrastructure supporting that human-operated equipment. Furthermore, nothing in
 this section shall prohibit the purchase of devices that support that human-operated equipment, including equipment to evaluate the utilization and environmental benefits of that human-operated equipment.

(4) Truck corridor improvements, including dedicated truck facilities or truck toll facilities, including the mitigation of the emissions from trucks or these facilities.

(5) Border access improvements that enhance goods movement between California and Mexico and that maximize the state’s ability to access funds made available to the state by federal law.

(6) Surface transportation, local road, and connector road improvements to effectively facilitate the movement of goods, particularly for ingress and egress to and from the state’s land ports of entry, airports, and seaports, to relieve traffic congestion along
 major trade or goods movement corridors.
